Utah statutes.
75-7-417.   Combination and division of trusts.
After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, a trustee may combine two or more
trusts into a single trust or divide a trust into two or more separate trusts,
if the result does not impair rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect
achievement of the purposes of the trust.
